Arkansas, session 2025, HB1278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 48, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
17-48-305. Surveyor entry onto commercial poultry farm.
(a) As used in this section, "commercial poultry farm" means a poultry
operation with a poultry house or poultry houses in excess of five thousand
square feet (5,000 sq. ft.).
(b) Before a surveyor enters onto a commercial poultry farm to survey
either the commercial poultry farm or a property adjacent to the commercial
poultry farm, the surveyor shall:
(1) Notify the owner of the commercial poultry farm before
entering; and
(2) Follow all protocols required by the commercial poultry farm
for visitors at the time of access, including without limitation biosecurity
*CRH071*
01/27/2025 2:24:40 PM CRH071

HB1278
protocols.



































01/27/2025 2:24:40 PM CRH071